Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-711 of Title 14A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Assessment fee” means a fee paid to the payment card
network for allowing a merchant to use a payment card or other
payment code or device in an electronic payment transaction;
2. “Electronic payment transaction” means a transaction in
which a person uses a payment card or other payment code or device
issued or approved through a payment card network to debit a deposit
account or use a line of credit, whether authorization is based on a
signature, personal identification number, or other means;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1940 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. “Exempted payment card issuer” means a payment card issuer
that has not held consolidated worldwide banking and nonbanking
assets including assets under management of more than Fifty Billion
Dollars ($50,000,000,000.00) in the preceding calendar year;
4. “Gratuity” means a voluntary monetary contribution to an
employee from a guest, patron, or customer in connection with
services rendered;
5. “Interchange fee” means a fee established, charged, put
forward, or received by a payment card network for the purpose of
compensating the payment card issuer for such issuer’s involvement
in an electronic payment transaction;
6. “Merchant” means a person or entity that accepts electronic
payment transactions and collects and remits a state or local tax;
7. “Payment card” means a credit card, debit card, check card,
or other card, code, or device that is issued to an authorized user
to purchase or obtain goods, services, money, or any other thing of
value;
8. “Payment card issuer” means a person issuing a payment card
or the person’s agent;
9. “Payment card network” means an entity that directly, or
through a licensed member, processor, or agent, provides the
proprietary services, infrastructure, and software that route
information and data to conduct payment card transaction
authorization, clearance, and settlement, and that an entity uses in
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1940 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

orde r to accept as a form of payment a brand of payment card that
may be used to carry out debit or credit transactions;
10. “State or local tax” includes a tax imposed by this state
or a unit of local government of this state; or
11. “Swipe fee” means the interchange fee and, if applicable,
the assessment fee.
B. A payment card network shall not establish, charge, put
forward, or receive an interchange fee, whether directly or through
an agent, licensed member, processor, contract, requirement,
condition, penalty, technological specification, inducement, or
otherwise, if:
1. The interchange fee is or includes a percentage multiplied
by the gross dollar amount of a transaction conducted with a payment
card; and
2. The interchange fee does not exclude from the gross dollar
amount of the transaction any amount attributable to a state or
local tax or gratuity.
C. A payment card network shall with respect to each form or
type of electronic payment transaction:
1. Deduct the amount of state or local tax imposed and gratuity
from the calculation of interchange fees attributable to the
transaction at the time of settlement; or


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1940 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Rebate the merchant an amount equal to the amount of
interchange fees attributable to the state or local tax imposed and
gratuity on the transaction.
D. A deduction or rebate under this section shall occur at the
time of settlement when the merchant is able to capture and transmit
state or local tax amounts and gratuity relevant to the sale at the
time of sale as part of the transaction finalization. If a merchant
does not capture and transmit state or local tax or gratuity amounts
relevant to the sale at the time of sale, then the merchant may
submit to the payment card network documentation of state or local
tax amounts and gratuity amounts collected on sales within one
hundred eighty (180) days after the transaction finalization, and
the payment card network shall accept such documentation and provide
the rebate within thirty (30) days after the merchant submits the
documentation.
E. Subsections B, C, and D of this section shall not be
construed to apply to an interchange fee that a payment card network
establishes, charges, puts forward, or receives solely for use by
exempted payment card issuers.
F. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create
liability for a payment card network regarding the accuracy of the
tax or gratuity data reported by the merchant.
G. It shall constitute a violation of this section for a
payment card issuer or a payment card network to alter or manipulate
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1940 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the computation and imposition of swipe fees by increasing the rate
or amount of the fees applicable to or imposed upon the portion of
an electronic payment transaction not attributable to state or local
taxes or gratuities to circumvent this section.
H. The Attorney General may promulgate any rules necessary for
the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 5, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1940 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)